lv_LV.aff
SFX h Y 161
SFX h   t   oša      [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošā      [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošai     [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošais    [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošajā    [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošajai   [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošajam   [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošajām   [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošajās   [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošajiem  [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošajos   [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošam     [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošām     [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošas     [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošās     [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   oši      [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošie     [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošiem    [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošo      [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošos     [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošs      [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošu      [^āēī]t
SFX h   t   ošus     [^āēī]t
SFX h   ēt   oša      [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošā      [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošai     [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošais    [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošajā    [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošajai   [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošajam   [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošajām   [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošajās   [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošajiem  [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošajos   [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošam     [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošām     [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošas     [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošās     [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   oši      [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošie     [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošiem    [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošo      [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošos     [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošs      [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošu      [ē]t
SFX h   ēt   ošus     [ē]t
SFX h   īt   oša      [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošā      [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošai     [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošais    [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošajā    [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošajai   [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošajam   [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošajām   [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošajās   [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošajiem  [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošajos   [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošam     [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošām     [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošas     [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošās     [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   oši      [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošie     [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošiem    [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošo      [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošos     [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošs      [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošu      [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   īt   ošus     [^cz][ī]t
SFX h   cīt  koša      [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košā      [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košai     [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košais    [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košajā    [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košajai   [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košajam   [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košajām   [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košajās   [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košajiem  [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košajos   [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košam     [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košām     [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košas     [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košās     [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  koši      [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košie     [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košiem    [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košo      [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košos     [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košs      [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košu      [c]īt
SFX h   cīt  košus     [c]īt
SFX h   īt   oša      [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošā      [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošai     [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošais    [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošajā    [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošajai   [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošajam   [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošajām   [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošajās   [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošajiem  [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošajos   [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošam     [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošām     [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošas     [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošās     [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   oši      [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošie     [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošiem    [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošo      [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošos     [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošs      [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošu      [^d]zīt
SFX h   īt   ošus     [^d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  goša      [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošā      [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošai     [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošais    [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošajā    [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošajai   [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošajam   [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošajām   [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošajās   [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošajiem  [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošajos   [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošam     [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošām     [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošas     [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošās     [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  goši      [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošie     [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošiem    [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošo      [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošos     [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošs      [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošu      [d]zīt
SFX h   dzīt  gošus     [d]zīt
SFX h   āt   oša      [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošā      [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošai     [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošais    [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošajā    [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošajai   [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošajam   [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošajām   [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošajās   [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošajiem  [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošajos   [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošam     [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošām     [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošas     [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošās     [ā]t
SFX h   āt   oši      [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošie     [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošiem    [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošo      [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošos     [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošs      [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošu      [ā]t
SFX h   āt   ošus     [ā]t
